Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1847.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $1,200,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,200,00 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the Minnesota STEM Ecosystem. Money must be used to support STEM learning opportunities and workforce development within the science and technology areas. The Minnesota STEM Ecosystem may award grants to programs that support STEM learning and workforce development to ensure strategic alignment of STEM initiatives across the state. new text end